Utah statutes.
65A-9-1.   Responsibility of division to manage range resources.

(1)  The division is responsible for the efficient management of all range resources on lands under its administration.

(2)  Its management shall be based on sound conservation principles, including practices to improve range conditions.



Amended by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

